apertium-moe.moe.lexc
LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%—%<quot%>:%— # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;


! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
